South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5569.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 62, Title 48 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 48-62-80.  (A) There is created the "South Carolina Farm Aid and Resiliency Grant Fund." This fund is separate and distinct from the general fund of the State and all other funds. Earnings on this fund must be credited to it and any balance in this fund at the end of a fiscal year carried forward in the fund in the succeeding fiscal year. Revenues credited to this fund in a fiscal year must be used to operate a grant program that provides financial assistance to farmers. (B) The Office of Resilience shall administer the fund and, in consultation with the Department of Agriculture, develop criteria, application procedures, and award guidelines for administering the grant program described in subsection (A). (C) From the Contingency Reserve Fund, there is appropriated fifty million dollars to the South Carolina Farm Aid and Resiliency Grant Fund. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----